sk-SK: Materiál lopty: Akryl; Keramický; Korok; Bavlna; Etylénvinylacetát (EVA); Umelá koža; Pena; Latex; Koža; Mikrovlákno; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretán (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Živica; Guma; Silikón; Syntetický; Termoplastický polyuretán (TPU); Vinyl; Iné
fr: Matériau du ballon: Acrylique; Céramique; Liège; Coton; Éthylène-acétate de vinyle (EVA); Faux cuir; Mousse; Latex; Cuir; Microfibre; Néoprène; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Polyuréthane (PU); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Résine; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Synthétique; Polyuréthane thermoplastique (TPU); Vinyl; Autre
el: Υλικό μπάλας: Ακρυλικό; Κεραμικό; Φελλός; Βαμβάκι; Πολυμερές αιθυλενίου και οξικού βινυλίου (EVA); Συνθετικό δέρμα; Αφρός; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Μικροΐνες; Νεοπρένιο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Ρητίνη; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Συνθετικό; Θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη (TPU); Βινύλιο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Material za žogo: Akril; Keramika; Pluta; Bombaž; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Umetno usnje; Pena; Latex; Usnje; Mikrovlakna; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Smola; Guma; Silikon; Sintetika; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Vinil; Drugo
zh-CN: 球材质: 丙烯酸; 陶瓷制品; 软木; 棉布; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯 (EVA); 人造皮革; 泡沫; 乳胶; 皮革; 超细纤维; 氯丁橡胶; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 树脂; 橡胶; 硅胶; 合成; 热塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
vi: Vật liệu bóng: Acrylic; Gốm; Thảm gỗ bần; Vải bông; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Da giả; Bọt xốp; Mủ cao su; Da; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Neoprene; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Nhựa resin; Cao su; Silicon; Tổng hợp; Polyurethane nhiệt dẻo (TPU); Nhựa vinyl; Khác
fi: Pallon materiaali: Akryyli; Keraaminen; Korkki; Puuvilla; Eteenivinyyliasetaatti (EVA); Keinonahka; Vaahto; Lateksi; Nahka; Mikrokuitu; Neopreeni; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Polyuretaani (PU); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Hartsi; Kumi; Silikoni; Synteettinen; Termoplastinen polyuretaani (TPU); Vinyyli; Muu
hu: Labda anyaga: Akril; Kerámia; Parafa; Pamut; Etilén-vinil-acetát (EVA); Műbőr; Hab; Latex; Bőr; Mikroszálas; Neoprén; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Poliuretán (PU); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Gyanta; Gumi; Szilikon; Szintetikus; Hőre lágyuló poliuretán (TPU); Vinil; Egyéb
it: Materiale della palla: Acrilico; Ceramica; Sughero; Cotone; Etilene acetato di vinile (EVA); Ecopelle; Schiuma; Lattice; Pelle; Microfibra; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Resina; Gomma; Silicone; Sintetico; Poliuretano termoplastico (TPU); Vinile; Altro
cs: Materiál kuličky: Akrylové; Keramika; Korek; Bavlna; Ethylen vinylacetát (EVA); Nepravá kůže; Pěna; Latex; Kůže; Mikrovlákno; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Pryskyřice; Guma; Silikon; Syntetické; Termoplastický polyuretan (TPU); Vinylové; Jiné
pl: Materiał piłki: Akryl; Ceramika; Korek; Bawełna; Polietylen-co-oktan winylu (EVA); Skaj; Piana; Lateks; Skórzane; Mikrofibra; Neopren; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Żywica; Guma; Silikon; Syntetyczne; Poliuretan termoplastyczny (TPU); Winyl; Inne
zh-TW: 球材質: 壓克力; 陶瓷; 軟木; 棉布; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯共聚物; 人造皮; 泡棉; 乳膠; 皮製; 超細纖維; 氯丁橡膠; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 樹脂; 橡膠; 矽膠; 合成; 熱塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 乙烯基; 其他
ru: Материал мяча: Акрил; Керамика; Пробка; Хлопок; Этиленвинилацетат (ЭВА); Искусственная кожа; Поролон; Латекс; Кожа; Микрофибра; Неопрен; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Полиуретан (ПУ); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Смола; Резина; Силикон; Синтетика; Термопластичный полиуретан (ТПУ); Винил; Другой
de: Kugelmaterial: Acryl; Keramik; Kork; Baumwolle; Ethylen-Vinylacetat (EVA); Kunstleder; Schaumstoff; Latex; Leder; Mikrofaser; Neopren; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Harz; Gummi; Silikon; Synthetisch; Thermoplastisches Polyurethan (TPU); Vinyl; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Material minge: Acrilic; Ceramică; Plută; Bumbac; Etilen acetat de vinil (EVA); Imitație de piele; Spumă; Latex; Piele; Microfibră; Neopren; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Rășină; Cauciuc; Silicon; Sintetic; Poliuretan termoplastic (TPU); Vinil; Altele
bg-BG: Материал на топката: Акрил; Керамика; Корк; Памук; Етиленвинилацетат (EVA); Изкуствена кожа; Пяна; Латекс; Кожа; Микрофибър; Неопрен; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Полиуретан (PU); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Смола; Каучук; Силикон; Синтетичен; Термопластичен полиуретан (TPU); Винил; Други
nb: Ballmateriale: Akryl; Keramikk; Kork; Bomull; Etylenvinylacetat (EVA); Kunstig lær; Skum; Lateks; Skinn; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Harpiks; Gummi; Silikon; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Vinyl; Annet
es: Material de la pelota: Acrílico; Cerámica; Corcho; Algodón; Acetato de etileno y vinilo (EVA); Cuero sintético; Espuma; Látex; Cuero; Microfibra; Neopreno; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Resina; Goma; Silicona; Sintético; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Vinilo; Otros
ja: ボール材質: アクリル; セラミック; コルク; コットン; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテート (EVA); フェイクレザー; フォーム; ラテックス; レザー; マイクロファイバー; ネオプレン; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; ポリウレタン (PU); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); レジン; ゴム; シリコーン; 合成品; 熱可塑性ポリウレタン (TPU); ビニール; その他
hr-HR: Materijal lopte: Akril; Keramika; Pluto; Pamuk; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Umjetna koža; Pjena; Lateks; Koža; Mikrovlakna; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Smola; Guma; Silikon; Sintetika; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Vinil; Ostalo
ko: 볼 소재: 아크릴; 세라믹; 코르크; 면; 에틸렌 비닐 아세테이트(EVA); 인조 가죽; 거품; 라텍스; 가죽; 극세사; 네오프렌; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 폴리우레탄(PU); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 수지; 고무; 실리콘; 인조; 열가소성 폴리우레탄(TPU); 비닐; 기타
sv: Boll - material: Akryl; Keramisk; Kork; Bomull; Etenvinylacetat (EVA); Fuskläder; Skum; Latex; Läder; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Harts; Gummi; Silikon; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Vinyl; Övrigt
da: Boldmateriale: Akryl; Keramik; Kork; Bomuld; Ethylen-vinylacetat (EVA); Kunstigt læder; Skum; Latex; Læder; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Harpiks; Gummi; Silikone; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk polyurethan (TPU); Vinyl; Andet
pt-BR: Material da bola: Acrílico; Cerâmica; Cortiça; Algodão; Etileno acetato de vinila (EVA); Couro falso; Espuma; Látex; Couro; Microfibra; Neoprene; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Resina; Borracha; Silicone; Sintético; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Vinil; Outro
pt-PT: Material da bola: Acrílico; Cerâmica; Cortiça; Algodão; Etileno acetato de vinilo (EVA); Couro falso; Espuma; Látex; Pele; Microfibra; Neoprene; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Resina; Borracha; Silicone; Sintético; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Vinil; Outro
lt-LT: Kamuolio medžiaga: Akrilas; Keramika; Kamštiena; Medvilnė; Etileno vinilo acetatas (EVA); Dirbtinė oda; Porolonas; Lateksas; Oda; Mikropluoštas; Neoprenas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Poliuretanas (PU); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Derva; Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Sintetika; Termoplastinis poliuretanas (TPU); Vinilas; Kita
en: Ball material: Acrylic; Ceramic; Cork; Cotton; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Faux leather; Foam; Latex; Leather; Microfiber; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Resin; Rubber; Silicone; Synthetic; Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Vinyl; Other
th: วัสดุสำหรับลูกบอล: อะคริลิก; เซรามิก; ต้นคอร์ก; สำลี; อีทิลีนไวนิลอะซิเตต (EVA); หนังเทียม; โฟม; ยางพารา; หนัง; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; นีโอพรีน; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); เรซิน; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; สังเคราะห์; เทอร์โมพลาสติกโพลิยูรีเทน (TPU); ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
tr: Bilye malzemesi: Akrilik; Seramik; Mantar; Pamuk; Etilen vinil asetat (EVA); Suni deri; Köpük; Lateks; Deri; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Poliüretan (PU); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Reçine; Kauçuk; Silikon; Sentetik; Termoplastik poliüretan (TPU); Vinil; Diğer
nl: Materiaal bal: Acryl; Keramiek; Kurk; Katoen; Ethyleen-vinylacetaat (EVA); Kunstleer; Schuim; Latex; Leer; Microvezel; Neopreen; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polyurethaan (PU); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Hars; Rubber; Siliconen; Synthetisch; Thermoplastisch polyurethaan (TPU); Vinyl; Andere